New Jersey, session 222, S4001.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 2 of P.L.2005, c.83 (C.26:2H-12.2b) is amended to read as follows: 2.    a.  A health care entity shall notify the division in writing if a health care professional who is employed by, under contract to render professional services to, or has privileges granted by, that health care entity, or who provides such services pursuant to an agreement with a health care services firm or staffing registry: (1)   for reasons relating to the health care professional's impairment, incompetency, or professional misconduct, which incompetency or professional misconduct relates adversely to patient care or safety: (a) has full or partial privileges summarily or temporarily revoked or suspended, or permanently reduced, suspended, or revoked; (b) has been removed from the list of eligible employees of a health services firm or staffing registry; (c) has been discharged from the staff; or (d) has had a contract to render professional services terminated or rescinded; (2)   has conditions or limitations placed on the exercise of clinical privileges or practice within the health care entity for reasons relating to the health care professional's impairment, incompetency, or professional misconduct or, which incompetency or professional misconduct relates adversely to patient care or safety, including, but not limited to, second opinion requirements, non-routine concurrent or retrospective review of admissions or care, non-routine supervision by one or more members of the staff, or the completion of remedial education or training; (3)   voluntarily resigns from the staff if: (a) the health care entity is reviewing the health care professional's patient care or reviewing whether, based upon its reasonable belief, the health care professional's conduct demonstrates an impairment or incompetence or is unprofessional, which incompetence or unprofessional conduct relates adversely to patient care or safety; or (b) the health care entity, through any member of the medical or administrative staff, has expressed an intention to do such a review; (4)   voluntarily relinquishes any partial privilege or authorization to perform a specific procedure if: (a) the health care entity is reviewing the health care professional's patient care or reviewing whether, based upon its reasonable belief, the health care professional's conduct demonstrates an impairment or incompetence or is unprofessional, which incompetence or unprofessional conduct relates adversely to patient care or safety; or (b) the health care entity, through any member of the medical or administrative staff, has expressed an intention to do such a review; (5)   while under, or subsequent to, a review by the health care entity of the health care professional's patient care or professional conduct is granted a leave of absence for reasons relating to a physical, mental, or emotional condition or drug or alcohol use which impairs the health care professional's ability to practice with reasonable skill and safety, except that no report is required for pregnancy-related leaves of absence or if the health care professional has sought assistance from a professional assistance or intervention program approved or designated by the division or a board to provide confidential oversight of the health care professional and is following the treatment regimen or monitoring as that program requires; or (6)   is a party to a medical malpractice liability suit, to which the health care entity is also a party, and in which there is a settlement, judgment, or arbitration award. As used in this subsection, incompetence, professional misconduct, and unprofessional conduct shall not include personal conduct, such as tardiness, insubordination, or other similar behavior, which does not relate to patient care or safety. b.    A health care entity shall notify the division in writing if it is in possession of information that indicates that a health care professional has failed to comply with a request to seek assistance from a professional assistance or intervention program approved or designated by the division or a board to provide confidential oversight of the health care professional, or has failed to follow the treatment regimen or monitoring program required by that program to assure that the health care professional's physical, mental, or emotional condition or drug or alcohol use does not impair the health care professional's ability to practice with reasonable skill and safety. c.     A health care entity shall notify the division in writing if any health care professional who has been the subject of a report pursuant to this section, has had conditions or limitations on the exercise of clinical privileges or practice within the health care entity altered, or privileges restored, or has resumed exercising clinical privileges that had been voluntarily relinquished. d.    In the case of a health care professional who is providing services at a health care entity pursuant to an agreement with a health care services firm or staffing agency and is the subject of a notice pursuant to this section, the health care entity shall, when it submits a notice to the division concerning that health care professional, provide a copy of the notice to the health care services firm or staffing agency. e.     The form of notification shall be prescribed by the Commissioner of Health, in consultation with the Commissioner of Human Services in the case of psychiatric facilities and developmental centers, and shall contain such information as may be required by the division and shall be made within seven days of the date of the action, settlement, judgment, or award. f.     A health care entity which fails to provide such notice to the division or fails to cooperate with a request for information by the division, the board or the Medical Practitioner Review Panel established pursuant to section 8 of P.L.1989, c.300 (C.45:9-19.8) shall be subject to such penalties as the Department of Health may determine pursuant to sections 13 and 14 of P.L.1971, c.136 (C.26:2H-13 and 26:2H-14). g.    A health care entity, or any employee thereof, which provides information to the division, the board, the Medical Practitioner Review Panel, a health care services firm or staffing agency, or the Department of Health, in good faith and without malice, regarding a health care professional pursuant to the provisions of this section or section 3 of P.L.1989, c.300 (C.26:2H-12.2a), is not liable for civil damages in any cause of action arising out of the provision or reporting of the information. h.    A health care entity shall provide the health care professional who is the subject of a notice pursuant to paragraphs (1), (2), (4), and (5) of subsection a. of this section and subsection c. of this section with a copy of the notice provided to the division, when the health care entity submits the notice to the division. i.     For the purposes of this section, section 3 of P.L.1989, c.300 (C.26:2H-12.2a) and section 15 of P.L.2005, c.83 (C.26:2H-12.2c): "Board" means a professional and occupational licensing board within the Division of Consumer Affairs in the Department of Law and Public Safety which licenses or otherwise authorizes a health care professional to practice a health care profession. "Division" means the Division of Consumer Affairs in the Department of Law and Public Safety. "Health care entity" means a health care facility licensed pursuant to P.L.1971, c.136 (C.26:2H-1 et seq.), a health maintenance organization authorized to operate pursuant to P.L.1973, c.337 (C.26:2J-1 et seq.), a carrier which offers a managed care plan regulated pursuant to P.L.1997, c.192 (C.26:2S-1 et seq.), a State or county psychiatric hospital, a State developmental center, a staffing registry, and a home care services agency as defined in section 1 of P.L.1947, c.262 (C.45:11-23). "Health care professional" means a person licensed or otherwise authorized pursuant to Title 45 or Title 52 of the Revised Statutes to practice a health care profession that is regulated by the Director of the Division of Consumer Affairs or by one of the following boards:  the State Board of Medical Examiners, the New Jersey Board of Nursing, the New Jersey State Board of Dentistry, the New Jersey State Board of Optometrists, the New Jersey State Board of Pharmacy, the State Board of Chiropractic Examiners, the Acupuncture Examining Board, the State Board of Physical Therapy, the State Board of Respiratory Care, the Orthotics and Prosthetics Board of Examiners, the State Board of Psychological Examiners, the State Board of Social Work Examiners, the State Board of Veterinary Medical Examiners, the State Board of Examiners of Ophthalmic Dispensers and Ophthalmic Technicians, the Audiology and Speech-Language Pathology Advisory Committee, the State Board of Marriage and Family Therapy Examiners, the Occupational Therapy Advisory Council and the Certified Psychoanalysts Advisory Committee.  "Health care professional" also includes [a nurse aide and] a personal care assistant certified by the Department of Health. (cf: P.L.2012, c.17, s.179) 2.    Section 2 of P.L.1997, c.100 (C.26:2H-83) is amended to read as follows: 2.    a.  The Department of Health shall not issue a [nurse aide or] personal care assistant certification to any applicant, except on a conditional basis as provided for in subsection d. of section 3 of P.L.1997, c.100 (C.26:2H-84), unless the Commissioner of Health first determines, consistent with the requirements of sections 2 through 6 of P.L.1997, c.100 (C.26:2H-83 through 87), that no criminal history record information exists on file in the Federal Bureau of Investigation, Identification Division, or in the State Bureau of Identification in the Division of State Police, which would disqualify that person from being certified. A [nurse aide or] personal care assistant certified by the department prior to the effective date of P.L.2000, c.20 upon whom a criminal history record background check has not been conducted pursuant to sections 2 through 6 of P.L.1997, c.100 (C.26:2H-83 through 87), shall be required to undergo that criminal history record background check as a condition of that individual's initial recertification following the effective date of P.L.2000, c.20. In addition, a follow-up criminal history record background check of federal records shall be conducted at least once every two years as a condition of recertification for every certified [nurse aide and] personal care assistant; except that the commissioner, in lieu of conducting follow-up criminal history record background checks for purposes of recertification, may provide for an alternative means of determining whether a certified [nurse aide or] personal care assistant has been convicted of a crime or disorderly persons offense which would disqualify that person from certification, including, but not limited to, a match of a person's Social Security number or other identifying information with records of criminal proceedings in this and other states. If the commissioner elects to implement this alternative means of determining whether a certified [nurse aide or] personal care assistant has been convicted of a crime or disorderly persons offense which would disqualify that person from certification, the commissioner shall report to the Governor and the Legislature prior to its implementation on the projected costs and procedures to be followed with respect to its implementation and setting forth the rationale therefor. A person shall be disqualified from certification if that person's criminal history record background check reveals a record of conviction of any of the following crimes and offenses: (1)   In New Jersey, any crime or disorderly persons offense: (a)   involving danger to the person, meaning those crimes and disorderly persons offenses set forth in N.J.S.2C:11-1 et seq., N.J.S.2C:12-1 et seq., N.J.S.2C:13-1 et seq., N.J.S.2C:14-1 et seq. or N.J.S.2C:15-1 et seq.; or (b)   against the family, children, or incompetents, meaning those crimes and disorderly persons offenses set forth in N.J.S.2C:24-1 et seq.; or (c)   involving theft as set forth in chapter 20 of Title 2C of the New Jersey Statutes; or (d)   involving any controlled dangerous substance or controlled substance analog as set forth in chapter 35 of Title 2C of the New Jersey Statutes except paragraph (4) of subsection a. of N.J.S.2C:35-10. (2)   In any other state or jurisdiction, of conduct which, if committed in New Jersey, would constitute any of the crimes or disorderly persons offenses described in paragraph (1) of this subsection. b.    Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection a. of this section, no person shall be disqualified from certification on the basis of any conviction disclosed by a criminal history record background check performed pursuant to sections 2 through 6 and section 14 of P.L.1997, c.100 (C.26:2H-83 through 87 and C.53:1-20.9a) if the person has affirmatively demonstrated to the Commissioner of Health clear and convincing evidence of the person's rehabilitation.  In determining whether a person has affirmatively demonstrated rehabilitation, the following factors shall be considered: (1)   the nature and responsibility of the position which the convicted person would hold, has held or currently holds, as the case may be; (2)   the nature and seriousness of the offense; (3)   the circumstances under which the offense occurred; (4)   the date of the offense; (5)   the age of the person when the offense was committed; (6)   whether the offense was an isolated or repeated incident; (7)   any social conditions which may have contributed to the offense; and (8)   any evidence of rehabilitation, including good conduct in prison or in the community, counseling or psychiatric treatment received, acquisition of additional academic or vocational schooling, successful participation in correctional work-release programs, or the recommendation of those who have had the person under their supervision. c.     If a person subject to the provisions of sections 2 through 6 of P.L.1997, c.100 (C.26:2H-83 through 87) refuses to consent to, or cooperate in, the securing of a criminal history record background check, the commissioner shall, as applicable: (1)   not issue a [nurse aide or] personal care assistant certification and shall notify the applicant, and the applicant's employer if the applicant is conditionally employed as provided in subsection d. of section 3 of P.L.1997, c.100 (C.26:2H-84) or the applicant's prospective employer if known, of that denial; or (2)   revoke the person's current [nurse aide or] personal care assistant certification and notify the person, and the person's employer, if known, of that revocation. (cf: P.L.2012, c.17, s.240) 3.    Section 3 of P.L.1997, c.100 (C.26:2H-84) is amended to read as follows: 3.    a.  An applicant for certification, or a certified [nurse aide or] personal care assistant who is required to undergo a criminal history record background check pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1997, c.100 (C.26:2H-83), shall submit to the Commissioner of Health that individual's name, address, and fingerprints taken on standard fingerprint cards by a State or municipal law enforcement agency.  The commissioner is authorized to exchange fingerprint data with and receive criminal history record information from the Federal Bureau of Investigation and the Division of State Police for use in making the determinations required by sections 2 through 6 of P.L.1997, c.100 (C.26:2H-83 through 87). b.    Upon receipt of the criminal history record information for a person from the Federal Bureau of Investigation or the Division of State Police, the commissioner shall immediately notify, in writing, the applicant, and the applicant's employer if the applicant is conditionally employed as provided in subsection d. of this section or the applicant's prospective employer if known, or a certified [nurse aide or] personal care assistant who is required to undergo a criminal history record background check pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1997, c.100 (C.26:2H-83) and that person's employer, as applicable, of the person's qualification or disqualification for certification under sections 2 through 6 of P.L.1997, c.100 (C.26:2H-83 through 87).  If the person is disqualified, the conviction or convictions which constitute the basis for the disqualification shall be identified in the notice to the person, but shall not be identified in the notice to the person's employer or prospective employer. c.     The person who is the subject of the background check shall have 30 days from the date of the written notice of disqualification to petition the commissioner for a hearing on the accuracy of the person's criminal history record information or to establish the person's rehabilitation under subsection b. of section 2 of P.L.1997, c.100 (C.26:2H-83). The commissioner shall notify the person's employer or prospective employer of the person's petition for a hearing within five days following the receipt of the petition from the person.  Upon the issuance of a final decision upon a petition to the commissioner pursuant to this subsection, the commissioner shall notify the person and the person's employer or prospective employer as to whether the person remains disqualified from certification under sections 2 through 6 of P.L.1997, c.100 (C.26:2H-83 through 87). d.    An applicant for certification may be issued conditional certification and may be employed as [a nurse aide or] a personal care assistant conditionally for a period not to exceed 60 days, pending completion of a criminal history record background check required under sections 2 through 6 of P.L.1997, c.100 (C.26:2H-83 through 87) by the Division of State Police in the Department of Law and Public Safety based upon an examination of its own files in accordance with section 14 of P.L.1997, c.100 (C.53:1-20.9a), and for an additional period not to exceed 60 days pending completion of a criminal history record background check by federal authorities as arranged for by the Division of State Police pursuant to section 14 of P.L.1997, c.100 (C.53:1-20.9a), if the person submits to the commissioner a sworn statement attesting that the person has not been convicted of any crime or disorderly persons offense as described in section 2 of P.L.1997, c.100 (C.26:2H-83).  A person who submits a false sworn statement shall be disqualified from certification as [a nurse aide or] a personal care assistant, as the case may be, and shall not have an opportunity to establish rehabilitation pursuant to subsection b. of section 2 of P.L.1997, c.100 (C.26:2H-83). A conditionally employed person, or an employed person certified as [a nurse aide or] a personal care assistant, who disputes the accuracy of the criminal history record information and who files a petition requesting a hearing pursuant to subsection c. of this section may remain employed by that person's employer until the commissioner rules on the person's petition but, pending the commissioner's ruling, the employer shall not permit the person to have unsupervised contact with patients, residents, or clients, as the case may be, who are 60 years of age or older. e. (1) A licensed health care facility or other entity that has received an application from or conditionally employs an applicant for [nurse aide or] personal care assistant certification, or employs a certified [nurse aide or] personal care assistant, and: (a)   receives notice from the Commissioner of Health that the applicant or certified [nurse aide or] personal care assistant, as applicable, has been determined by the commissioner to be disqualified from certification as a [nurse aide or] personal care assistant pursuant to sections 2 through 6 of P.L.1997, c.100 (C.26:2H-83 through 87); or (b)   terminates its employment of a conditionally employed applicant for [nurse aide or] personal care assistant certification or a certified [nurse aide or] personal care assistant because the person was disqualified from employment at the health care facility or other entity on the basis of a conviction of a crime or disorderly persons offense as described in section 2 of P.L.1997, c.100 (C.26:2H-83) after commencing employment at the health care facility or other entity; shall be immune from liability for disclosing that disqualification or termination in good faith to another licensed health care facility or other entity that is qualified by statute or regulation to employ the person as a [nurse aide or] personal care assistant. (2)   A licensed health care facility or other entity which discloses information pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection shall be presumed to be acting in good faith unless it is shown by clear and convincing evidence that the health care facility or other entity acted with actual malice toward the person who is the subject of the information. f.     (1) A licensed health care facility or other entity, upon receiving notice from the Commissioner of Health that a person employed by it as a [nurse aide or] personal care assistant, including a conditionally employed person, has been convicted of a crime or disorderly persons offense as described in section 2 of P.L.1997, c.100 (C.26:2H-83) after commencing employment at the health care facility or other entity, shall: (a)   immediately terminate the person's employment as a [nurse aide or] personal care assistant; and (b)   report information about the termination to the Commissioner of Health in a manner prescribed by the commissioner, who shall thereupon deem the person to be disqualified from certification as a [nurse aide or] personal care assistant, subject to the provisions of paragraph (3) of this subsection. (2)   A licensed health care facility or other entity shall be immune from liability for any actions taken in good faith pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection and shall be presumed to be acting in good faith unless it is shown by clear and convincing evidence that the health care facility or other entity acted with actual malice toward the employee. (3)   The person terminated from employment pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection shall have 30 days from the date of the termination to petition the commissioner for a hearing on the accuracy of the information about the conviction reported to the commissioner or to establish why the person should not be terminated from employment, and disqualified from certification, as a [nurse aide or] personal care assistant. The commissioner shall notify the person's employer of the person's petition for a hearing within five days following the receipt of the petition from the person.  Upon the issuance of a final decision upon a petition to the commissioner pursuant to this paragraph, the commissioner shall notify the person and the person's employer as to whether: (a)   the person is to be reinstated in the person's employment as a [nurse aide or] personal care assistant and retain the person's certification; or (b)   the person's termination from employment as a [nurse aide or] personal care assistant stands and the person remains disqualified from certification. g.    The commissioner shall provide for a registry of all persons who have successfully completed all training and competency evaluation requirements for certification as a [nurse aide or] personal care assistant and shall provide for the inclusion in the registry of information about the disqualification of any person from certification pursuant to sections 2 through 6 of P.L.1997, c.100 (C.26:2H-83 through 87); for which purposes, the commissioner may use an existing registry established pursuant to statute or regulation, subject to the requirements of federal law.  The registry shall include the specific documented findings constituting the basis for that disqualification, except that the information shall indicate that the person was convicted of a crime or disorderly persons offense as described in section 2 of P.L.1997, c.100 (C.26:2H-83), but shall not identify the conviction or convictions which constitute the basis for the disqualification. (cf: P.L.2012, c.17, s.241) 4.    Section 4 of P.L.1997, c.100 (C.26:2H-85) is amended to read as follows: 4.    The Department of Health shall assume the cost of the criminal history record background check conducted on an applicant for [nurse aide or] personal care assistant certification, or a certified [nurse aide or] personal care assistant, as the case may be, pursuant to sections 2 through 6 and section 14 of P.L.1997, c.100 (C.26:2H-83 through 87 and C.53:1-20.9a). (cf: P.L.2012, c.17, s.242) 5.    Section 1 of P.L.2002, c.104 (C.45:1-28) is amended to read as follows: 1.    As used in this act: "Applicant" means an applicant for the licensure or other authorization to engage in a health care profession. "Board" means a professional and occupational licensing board within the Division of Consumer Affairs in the Department of Law and Public Safety. "Director" means the Director of the Division of Consumer Affairs in the Department of Law and Public Safety. "Division" means the Division of Consumer Affairs in the Department of Law and Public Safety. "Health care professional" means a health care professional who is licensed or otherwise authorized, pursuant to Title 45 or Title 52 of the Revised Statutes, to practice a health care profession that is regulated by one of the following boards or by the Director of the Division of Consumer Affairs:  the State Board of Medical Examiners, the New Jersey Board of Nursing, the New Jersey State Board of Dentistry, the New Jersey State Board of Optometrists, the New Jersey State Board of Pharmacy, the State Board of Chiropractic Examiners, the Acupuncture Examining Board, the State Board of Physical Therapy, the State Board of Respiratory Care, the Orthotics and Prosthetics Board of Examiners, the State Board of Psychological Examiners, the State Board of Social Work Examiners, the State Board of Veterinary Medical Examiners, the State Board of Examiners of Ophthalmic Dispensers and Ophthalmic Technicians, the Audiology and Speech-Language Pathology Advisory Committee, the State Board of Marriage and Family Therapy Examiners, the Occupational Therapy Advisory Council, the Certified Psychoanalysts Advisory Committee, the State Board of Polysomnography, the State Board of Applied Behavior Analyst Examiners, the State Board of Creative Arts and Activities Therapies, or the State Board of Dietetics and Nutrition. Health care professional shall not include a [nurse aide or] personal care assistant who is required to undergo a criminal history record background check pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1997, c.100 (C.26:2H-83) [or] , a homemaker-home health aide who is required to undergo a criminal history record background check pursuant to section 7 of P.L.1997, c.100 (C.45:11-24.3) , or a certified nurse aide who is required to undergo a criminal history record background check pursuant to sections 8 and 9 of P.L.   , c.   (C.     ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). "Licensee" means an individual who has been issued a license or other authorization to practice a health care profession. (cf: P.L.2024, c.67, s.1) 6.    Section 2 of P.L.1993, c.249 (C.52:27D-407) is amended to read as follows: 2.    As used in this act: "Abuse" means the willful infliction of physical pain, injury or mental anguish, unreasonable confinement, or the willful deprivation of services which are necessary to maintain a person's physical and mental health. "Caretaker" means a person who has assumed the responsibility for the care of a vulnerable adult as a result of family relationship or who has assumed responsibility for the care of a vulnerable adult voluntarily, by contract, or by order of a court of competent jurisdiction, whether or not they reside together. "Commissioner" means the Commissioner of Human Services. "Community setting" means a private residence or any noninstitutional setting in which a person may reside alone or with others, but shall not include residential health care facilities, rooming houses or boarding homes or any other facility or living arrangement subject to licensure by, operated by, or under contract with, a State department or agency. "County adult protective services provider" means a county Board of Social Services or other public or nonprofit agency with experience as a New Jersey provider of protective services for adults, designated by the county and approved by the commissioner. The county adult protective services provider receives reports made pursuant to this act, maintains pertinent records and provides, arranges, or recommends protective services. "County director" means the director of a county adult protective services provider. "Department" means the Department of Human Services. "Emergency medical technician" means a person trained in basic life support services as defined in section 1 of P.L.1985, c.351 (C.26:2K-21) and who is certified by the Department of Health to provide that level of care. "Exploitation" means the act or process of illegally or improperly using a person or his resources for another person's profit or advantage. "Firefighter" means a paid or volunteer firefighter. "Health care professional" means a health care professional who is licensed or otherwise authorized, pursuant to Title 45 or Title 52 of the Revised Statutes, to practice a health care profession that is regulated by one of the following boards or by the Director of the Division of Consumer Affairs: the State Board of Medical Examiners, the New Jersey Board of Nursing, the New Jersey State Board of Dentistry, the New Jersey State Board of Optometrists, the New Jersey State Board of Pharmacy, the State Board of Chiropractic Examiners, the Acupuncture Examining Board, the State Board of Physical Therapy, the State Board of Respiratory Care, the Orthotics and Prosthetics Board of Examiners, the State Board of Psychological Examiners, the State Board of Social Work Examiners, the State Board of Examiners of Ophthalmic Dispensers and Ophthalmic Technicians, the Audiology and Speech-Language Pathology Advisory Committee, the State Board of Marriage and Family Therapy Examiners, the Occupational Therapy Advisory Council, the Certified Psychoanalysts Advisory Committee, and the State Board of Polysomnography.  "Health care professional" also means a [nurse aide or] personal care assistant who is certified by the Department of Health. "Neglect" means an act or failure to act by a vulnerable adult or his caretaker which results in the inadequate provision of care or services necessary to maintain the physical and mental health of the vulnerable adult, and which places the vulnerable adult in a situation which can result in serious injury or which is life-threatening. "Protective services" means voluntary or court-ordered social, legal, financial, medical or psychiatric services necessary to safeguard a vulnerable adult's rights and resources, and to protect a vulnerable adult from abuse, neglect or exploitation.  Protective services include, but are not limited to: evaluating the need for services, providing or arranging for appropriate services, obtaining financial benefits to which a person is entitled, and arranging for guardianship and other legal actions. "Vulnerable adult" means a person 18 years of age or older who resides in a community setting and who, because of a physical or mental illness, disability or deficiency, lacks sufficient understanding or capacity to make, communicate, or carry out decisions concerning his well-being and is the subject of abuse, neglect or exploitation.  A person shall not be deemed to be the subject of abuse, neglect or exploitation or in need of protective services for the sole reason that the person is being furnished nonmedical remedial treatment by spiritual means through prayer alone or in accordance with a recognized religious method of healing in lieu of medical treatment, and in accordance with the tenets and practices of the person's established religious tradition. (cf: P.L.2012, c.17, c.424) 7.    Section 14 of P.L.1997, c.100 (C.53:1-20.9a) is amended to read as follows: 14.  a.  In accordance with the provisions of sections 2 through 6 and sections 7 through 13 of P.L.1997, c.100 (C.26:2H-83 through 87 and C.45:11-24.3 through 24.9) and P.L.2002, c.104 (C.45:1-28 et al.), the Division of State Police in the Department of Law and Public Safety shall conduct a criminal history record background check, including a name and fingerprint identification check, of: (1)   each applicant for [nurse aide or] personal care assistant certification submitted to the Department of Health [and Senior Services] and of each applicant for homemaker-home health aide and nurse aide submitted to the New Jersey Board of Nursing in the Division of Consumer Affairs; (2)   each [nurse aide or] personal care assistant certified by the Department of Health [and Senior Services] and each homemaker-home health aide and nurse aide certified by the New Jersey Board of Nursing, as required pursuant to P.L.1997, c.100 (C.26:2H-83 et al.); and (3)   each applicant for licensure or other authorization to engage in a health care profession who is required to undergo a criminal history record background check pursuant to P.L.2002, c.104 (C.45:1-28 et al.). b.    For the purpose of conducting a criminal history record background check pursuant to subsection a. of this section, the Division of State Police shall examine its own files and arrange for a similar examination by federal authorities. The division shall immediately forward the information obtained as a result of conducting the check to:  the Commissioner of Health [and Senior Services], in the case of an applicant for [nurse aide or] personal care assistant certification or a certified [nurse aide or] personal care assistant; the New Jersey Board of Nursing in the Division of Consumer Affairs in the Department of Law and Public Safety, in the case of an applicant for homemaker-home health aide or nurse aide certification or a certified homemaker-home health aide or nurse aide; and the Director of the Division of Consumer Affairs in the Department of Law and Public Safety, in the case of an applicant for licensure or other authorization to practice as a health care professional as defined in section 1 of P.L.2002, c.104 (C.45:1-28). (cf: P.L.2002, c.104, s.5) 8.    (New section) a.  The New Jersey Board of Nursing shall not issue a nurse aide certification to any applicant, except on a conditional basis as provided for in subsection d. of section 9 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), unless the board first determines, consistent with the requirements of sections 8 through 11 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), that no criminal history record information exists on file in the Federal Bureau of Investigation, Identification Division, or in the State Bureau of Identification in the Division of State Police, which would disqualify that person from being certified. In addition, a follow-up criminal history record background check of federal records shall be conducted at least once every two years as a condition of recertification for every certified nurse aide; except that the board, in lieu of conducting follow-up criminal history record background checks for purposes of recertification, may provide for an alternative means of determining whether a certified nurse aide has been convicted of a crime or disorderly persons offense which would disqualify that person from certification, including, but not limited to, a match of a person's Social Security number or other identifying information with records of criminal proceedings in this and other states.  If the board elects to implement this alternative means of determining whether a certified nurse aide has been convicted of a crime or disorderly persons offense which would disqualify that person from certification, the board shall report to the Governor and the Legislature prior to its implementation on the projected costs and procedures to be followed with respect to its implementation and setting forth the rationale therefor. A person shall be disqualified from certification if that person's criminal history record background check reveals a record of conviction of any of the following crimes and offenses: (1)   In New Jersey, any crime or disorderly persons offense: (a)   involving danger to the person, meaning those crimes and disorderly persons offenses set forth in N.J.S.2C:11-1 et seq., N.J.S.2C:12-1 et seq., N.J.S.2C:13-1 et seq., N.J.S.2C:14-1 et seq. or N.J.S.2C:15-1 et seq.; or (b)   against the family, children, or incompetents, meaning those crimes and disorderly persons offenses set forth in N.J.S.2C:24-1 et seq.; or (c)   involving theft as set forth in chapter 20 of Title 2C of the New Jersey Statutes; or (d)   involving any controlled dangerous substance or controlled substance analog as set forth in chapter 35 of Title 2C of the New Jersey Statutes except paragraph (4) of subsection a. of N.J.S.2C:35-10. (2)   In any other state or jurisdiction, of conduct which, if committed in New Jersey, would constitute any of the crimes or disorderly persons offenses described in paragraph (1) of this subsection. b.    Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection a. of this section, no person shall be disqualified from certification on the basis of any conviction disclosed by a criminal history record background check performed pursuant to sections 8 through 11 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) and section 14 of P.L.1997, c.100 (C.53:1-20.9a) if the person has affirmatively demonstrated to the board clear and convincing evidence of the person's rehabilitation.  In determining whether a person has affirmatively demonstrated rehabilitation, the following factors shall be considered: (1)   the nature and responsibility of the position which the convicted person would hold, has held or currently holds, as the case may be; (2)   the nature and seriousness of the offense; (3)   the circumstances under which the offense occurred; (4)   the date of the offense; (5)   the age of the person when the offense was committed; (6)   whether the offense was an isolated or repeated incident; (7)   any social conditions which may have contributed to the offense; and (8)   any evidence of rehabilitation, including good conduct in prison or in the community, counseling or psychiatric treatment received, acquisition of additional academic or vocational schooling, successful participation in correctional work-release programs, or the recommendation of those who have had the person under their supervision. c.     If a person subject to the provisions of sections 8 through 11 of P.L.    , c.     (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) refuses to consent to, or cooperate in, the securing of a criminal history record background check, the board shall, as applicable: (1)   not issue a nurse aide certification and shall notify the applicant, and the applicant's employer if the applicant is conditionally employed as provided in subsection d. of section 9 of P.L.    , c.     (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) or the applicant's prospective employer if known, of that denial; or (2)   revoke the person's current nurse aide certification and notify the person, and the person's employer, if known, of that revocation. 9.    (New section)  a.  An applicant for certification, or a certified nurse aide who is required to undergo a criminal history record background check pursuant to section 8 of P.L.    , c.    (C.         ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), shall submit to the board that individual's name, address, and fingerprints taken on standard fingerprint cards by a State or municipal law enforcement agency.  The board is authorized to exchange fingerprint data with and receive criminal history record information from the Federal Bureau of Investigation and the Division of State Police for use in making the determinations required by sections 8 through 11 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). b.    Upon receipt of the criminal history record information for a person from the Federal Bureau of Investigation or the Division of State Police, the board shall immediately notify, in writing, the applicant, and the applicant's employer if the applicant is conditionally employed as provided in subsection d. of this section or the applicant's prospective employer if known, or a certified nurse aide who is required to undergo a criminal history record background check pursuant to section 8 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) and that person's employer, as applicable, of the person's qualification or disqualification for certification under sections 8 through 11 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). If the person is disqualified, the conviction or convictions which constitute the basis for the disqualification shall be identified in the notice to the person, but shall not be identified in the notice to the person's employer or prospective employer. c.     The person who is the subject of the background check shall have 30 days from the date of the written notice of disqualification to petition the board for a hearing on the accuracy of the person's criminal history record information or to establish the person's rehabilitation under subsection b. of section 8 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill).  The board shall notify the person's employer or prospective employer of the person's petition for a hearing within five days following the receipt of the petition from the person.  Upon the issuance of a final decision upon a petition to the board pursuant to this subsection, the board shall notify the person and the person's employer or prospective employer as to whether the person remains disqualified from certification under sections 8 through 11 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature). d.    An applicant for certification may be issued conditional certification and may be employed as a nurse aide conditionally for a period not to exceed 60 days, pending completion of a criminal history record background check required under sections 8 through 11 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature) by the Division of State Police in the Department of Law and Public Safety based upon an examination of its own files in accordance with section 14 of P.L.1997, c.100 (C.53:1-20.9a), and for an additional period not to exceed 60 days pending completion of a criminal history record background check by federal authorities as arranged for by the Division of State Police pursuant to section 14 of P.L.1997, c.100 (C.53:1-20.9a), if the person submits to the board a sworn statement attesting that the person has not been convicted of any crime or disorderly persons offense as described in section 8 of P.L.    , c.    (C. ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill).  A person who submits a false sworn statement shall be disqualified from certification as a nurse aide, as the case may be, and shall not have an opportunity to establish rehabilitation pursuant to subsection b. of section 8 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). A conditionally employed person, or an employed person certified as a nurse aide, who disputes the accuracy of the criminal history record information and who files a petition requesting a hearing pursuant to subsection c. of this section may remain employed by that person's employer until the board rules on the person's petition but, pending the board's ruling, the employer shall not permit the person to have unsupervised contact with patients, residents, or clients, as the case may be, who are 60 years of age or older. e. (1) A licensed health care facility or other entity that has received an application from or conditionally employs an applicant for nurse aide certification, or employs a certified nurse aide, shall be immune from liability for disclosing that disqualification or termination in good faith to another licensed health care facility or other entity that is qualified by statute or regulation to employ the person as a nurse aide, provided that the licensed health care facility or other entity: (a)   receives notice from the board that the applicant or certified nurse aide, as applicable, has been determined by the board to be disqualified from certification as a nurse aide pursuant to sections 8 through 11 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature); or (b)   terminates its employment of a conditionally employed applicant for nurse aide certification or a certified nurse aide because the person was disqualified from employment at the health care facility or other entity on the basis of a conviction of a crime or disorderly persons offense as described in section 8 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) after commencing employment at the health care facility or other entity. (2)   A licensed health care facility or other entity which discloses information pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection shall be presumed to be acting in good faith unless it is shown by clear and convincing evidence that the health care facility or other entity acted with actual malice toward the person who is the subject of the information. f. (1) A licensed health care facility or other entity, upon receiving notice from the board that a person employed by it as a nurse aide, including a conditionally employed person, has been convicted of a crime or disorderly persons offense as described in section 8 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) after commencing employment at the health care facility or other entity, shall: (a)   immediately terminate the person's employment as a nurse aide; and (b)   report information about the termination to the board in a manner prescribed by the board, who shall thereupon deem the person to be disqualified from certification as a nurse aide, subject to the provisions of paragraph (3) of this subsection. (2)   A licensed health care facility or other entity shall be immune from liability for any actions taken in good faith pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection and shall be presumed to be acting in good faith unless it is shown by clear and convincing evidence that the health care facility or other entity acted with actual malice toward the employee. (3)   The person terminated from employment pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection shall have 30 days from the date of the termination to petition the board for a hearing on the accuracy of the information about the conviction reported to the board or to establish why the person should not be terminated from employment, and disqualified from certification, as a nurse aide. The board shall notify the person's employer of the person's petition for a hearing within five days following the receipt of the petition from the person.  Upon the issuance of a final decision upon a petition to the board pursuant to this paragraph, the board shall notify the person and the person's employer as to whether: (a)   the person is to be reinstated in the person's employment as a nurse aide and retain the person's certification; or (b)   the person's termination from employment as a nurse aide stands and the person remains disqualified from certification. g.    The board shall provide for a registry of all persons who have successfully completed all training and competency evaluation requirements for certification as a nurse aide and shall provide for the inclusion in the registry of information about the disqualification of any person from certification pursuant to sections 8 through 11 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature); for which purposes, the board may use an existing registry established pursuant to statute or regulation, subject to the requirements of federal law.  The registry shall include the specific documented findings constituting the basis for that disqualification, except that the information shall indicate that the person was convicted of a crime or disorderly persons offense as described in section 8 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), but shall not identify the conviction or convictions which constitute the basis for the disqualification. 10.  (New section) The Department of Law and Public Safety shall assume the cost of the criminal history record background check conducted on an applicant for nurse aide certification, or a certified nurse aide, as the case may be, pursuant to sections 8 through 11 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature) and section 14 of P.L.1997, c.100 (C.53:1-20.9a). 11.  (New section) Any person submitting a false sworn statement pursuant to section 9 of P.L.    , c. (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) shall be subject to a fine of not more than $1,000, which may be assessed by the board. 12.  (New section) An individual certified as a nurse aide by another state or territory of the United States may apply to have that certification entered on the registry established and maintained by the board pursuant to section 9 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), provided that: a.     the board receives documentation from the other state or territory that the applicant holds a current, valid certification as a nurse aide in the state or territory; b.    the applicant has not been convicted of any crimes and has no documented findings of abuse, neglect, or misappropriation of resident property in the other state or territory; c.     the applicant complies with the criminal history record background check requirements set forth under sections 8 through 11 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill); and d. (1) the applicant has completed within the preceding 24 months the amount of continuing education hours required by regulation for a nurse aide; or (2)   the applicant has the equivalent of at least two years of full time employment in the other state or territory as a nurse aide and the most recent date of such employment is within the 24-month period immediately preceding the date of the application.  The board shall require an individual applying for a certification to be entered on the registry on the basis of work experience pursuant to this paragraph to complete any clinical skills competency examination and any written and oral competency examination the board may require pursuant to regulation, to verify the individual meets New Jersey's training and competency requirements. 13.  Section 1 of P.L.2019, c.18 (C.26:2H-87.1) is repealed. 14.  This act shall take effect on the first day of the 19th month next following enactment.  The New Jersey Board of Nursing may take such anticipatory administrative action in advance of the effective dates of this act as shall be necessary for implementation of this act.